test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonymidig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gwaaboozoonsmiba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmidig
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: waaboozoonymiba
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonymidig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: waaboozoonsmiba
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: nwaaboozoonyman
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nwaaboozoonyming
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nwaaboozoonymag
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: nwaaboozoonsman
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nwaaboozoonsming
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmag
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gwaaboozoonyman
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gwaaboozoonyming
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gwaaboozoonymag
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gwaaboozoonsman
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gwaaboozoonsming
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmag
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: waaboozoonyman
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozoonyming
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: waaboozoonsman
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozoonsming
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: waaboozoonyman
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozoonyming
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: waaboozoonymag
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: waaboozoonsman
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozoonsming
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: waaboozoonsmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonyshinaa
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonsshinaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshinaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshiwaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshinaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshiwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: waaboozoonyshini
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: waaboozoonsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: nwaaboozoonyshiba
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonyshidig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: nwaaboozoonsshiba
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonsshidig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gwaaboozoonyshiba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshidig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gwaaboozoonsshiba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshidig
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonyshiba
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonyshidig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonsshiba
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+4: nwaaboozoonyshan
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: nwaaboozoonyshing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: nwaaboozoonyshag
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+4: nwaaboozoonsshan
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: nwaaboozoonsshing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: nwaaboozoonsshag
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+4: gwaaboozoonyshan
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gwaaboozoonyshing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshag
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gwaaboozoonsshan
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gwaaboozoonsshing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshag
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+4: waaboozoonyshan
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonyshing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waaboozoonsshan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonsshing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+4: waaboozoonyshan
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonyshing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonyshag
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waaboozoonsshan
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonsshing
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonsshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozoonynaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonynaandig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozoonsnaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonsnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonynaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonynaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonywaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonywaadig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonsnaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonswaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonswaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: waaboozoonyniwba
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: waaboozoonsniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozoonynaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozoonynaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozoonynaanig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozoonsnaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozoonsnaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozoonsnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonynaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonynaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonynaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonywaan
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonywaang
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonywaag
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonsnaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonsnaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonsnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonswaan
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonswaang
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonswaag
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: waaboozoonywaan
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozoonywaang
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+3+4+4: waaboozoonyniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: waaboozoonyniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: waaboozoonswaan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozoonswaang
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4+4: waaboozoonsniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: waaboozoonsniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonybaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonybaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonybaniig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonsbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonsbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonsbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonybaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonybaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonybaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsbaniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+4: waaboozoonybaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonybaniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waaboozoonsbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+4: waaboozoonybaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonybaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonybaniig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waaboozoonsbaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonsbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nwaaboozmishnaa
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gwaaboozmishnaa
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gwaaboozmishwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: waaboozmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nwaaboozmishba
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozmishdig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gwaaboozmishba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozmishdig
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: waaboozmishba
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: nwaaboozmishan
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nwaaboozmishing
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nwaaboozmishag
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gwaaboozmishan
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gwaaboozmishing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gwaaboozmishag
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: waaboozmishan
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: waaboozmishing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: waaboozmishan
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: waaboozmishing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: waaboozmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozminaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozminaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozminaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozminaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozmiwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozmiwaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: waaboozminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozminaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozminaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozminaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozminaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozminaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozminaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozmiwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozmiwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozmiwaag
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: waaboozmiwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozmiwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: waaboozminwan
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: waaboozminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: nwaaboozmibniin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozmibniing
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozmibniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gwaaboozmibniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozmibniing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozmibniig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: waaboozmibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: waaboozmibniing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: waaboozmibniin
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: waaboozmibniing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: waaboozmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozshinaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozshinaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozshinaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozshinaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozshiwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozshiwaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: waaboozshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozshinaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozshinaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozshinaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozshinaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozshinaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozshinaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozshiwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozshiwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozshiwaag
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: waaboozshiwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozshiwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4+4: waaboozshinwan
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: waaboozshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+4: nwaaboozshibniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozshibniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozshibniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gwaaboozshibniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozshibniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozshibniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozshibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozshibniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozshibniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozshibniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaabooznaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaabooznaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaabooznaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaabooznaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaabooznaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaabooznaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozwaabniig
